Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2388SV (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 193 Section 1. Section 452A.53, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. Each vehicle operated into or through Iowa in interstate 3 operations using motor fuel, special fuel, or electric fuel 4 acquired in any other state shall carry in or on the vehicle 5 a duplicate or evidence of the permit or license required in 6 this section . A fee not to exceed fifty cents one dollar shall 7 be charged for each duplicate or other evidence of a permit or 8 license issued. 9